Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1502.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-879.2b, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1-879.2b. As used in the Alzheimer’s Dementia and Other
Forms of Dementia Special Care Disclosure Act:
1. “Special care” means care that is provided to persons with a
diagnosis of probable Alzheimer’s dementia or other forms of
dementia by an entity that provides such care;
2. “Department” means the State Department of Health; and
3. “Dementia” means the impaired ability to remember, think, or
make decisions that interferes with a person’s everyday activities;
and

4. “Alzheimer-Dementia Disclosure Act Advisory Council” shall
mean the advisory council created in Section 3 of this act.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-879.2c, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 487, O.S.L. 2025 (63 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 1-879.2c), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1-879.2c. A. 1. Pursuant to rules promulgated under
the provisions of the Alzheimer’s Dementia and Other Forms of
Dementia Special Care Disclosure Act, any nursing facility,
residential care facility, assisted living facility center, adult
day care center, continuum of care facility, or special care
facility that publicly advertises, intentionally markets, or
otherwise engages in promotional campaigns for the purpose of
communicating that such facility offers care, memory care, or
treatment methods within the facility that distinguish it as being
especially applicable to or suitable to persons with Alzheimer’s
dementia or other forms of dementia diagnoses shall disclose the
type of care, memory care, or treatment provided that distinguishes
it as being especially applicable to or suitable for such persons.
2. The disclosure shall be made using a form developed by the
State Department of Health and shall be made to:
a. the Department,
b. any representative of a person with Alzheimer’s
dementia or other form of dementia who is considering
placement within a special care unit, program, or
facility, and
c. the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman.
3. A referral agency, when disclosing documents pursuant to
Section 1-866.2 of this title, shall provide to any representative
of a person who has notified the referral agency of a diagnosis of
Alzheimer’s dementia or other form of dementia and who is
considering placement within a special care unit, program, memory
care, or facility, electronic or physical access to the form for
each facility. The Department of Health shall maintain a public
searchable database of forms. If no such form is available from the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1502 Page 2

Department of Health, this section shall not apply. Neither a
facility nor a referral agency shall be liable for the actions or
inactions of the other pursuant to this section.
4. The facility shall submit the disclosure form to the
Department prior to entering into any agreement to provide care or
services.
5. The Department shall examine each disclosure for
completeness and accuracy at the time the disclosure is submitted to
the Department.
6. The Department shall review the most recent disclosure in
the Department’s records during the facility’s regular inspection to
verify that the disclosure is current and that the services
described in the disclosure are provided to residents as described
in the disclosure.
B. The information disclosed as required by this section shall
include the following areas:
1. A written description of the special care unit unit’s,
program program’s, or facility’s overall philosophy and mission as
it relates to the needs of residents with Alzheimer’s dementia or
other forms of dementia;
2. The process and criteria for placement in, or transfer or
discharge from, the unit, program, or facility;
3. The process used for assessment, establishment, and
implementation of a resident plan of care, as it relates to
Alzheimer’s dementia and other forms of dementia, including the
method by which the plan evolves, the frequency of assessment, and
how the facility will respond to changes in the condition of the
resident;
4. Staff-to-resident ratios, staff training and continuing
education that are in addition to all regularly prescribed training
and are commensurate with the need for increased care and
supervision for residents with Alzheimer’s dementia or other forms
of dementia;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1502 Page 3

5. The physical environment and design features appropriate to
support the functioning of cognitively impaired residents;
6. The types and frequency of resident activities designed for
residents with Alzheimer’s dementia or other forms of dementia and
descriptions of those therapeutic activities designed to address
cognitive function and engage residents with varying stages of
dementia;
7. The involvement of families in care planning and other
aspects of care, and the availability of family support programs;
8. The fees for care and any additional fees; and
9. Any accreditations or certifications issued to the facility
related to the care and services provided to residents with
Alzheimer’s dementia or other forms of dementia.
C. The Department, with input from the Alzheimer-Dementia
Disclosure Act Advisory Council, shall develop a standardized
disclosure form. Any change in the information initially submitted
by the facility or other entity shall be reported to the Department
at the time the change is made.
D. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to
preclude a facility without a special care unit or program from
admitting a person with Alzheimer’s dementia or other forms of
dementia.
E. The State Commissioner of Health, with input from the
Alzheimer-Dementia Disclosure Act Advisory Council, shall promulgate
rules to effectuate the provisions of the Alzheimer’s Dementia and
Other Forms of Dementia Special Care Disclosure Act.
F. There is hereby created the Alzheimer-Dementia Disclosure
Act Advisory Council. The Council shall make recommendations to the
State Commissioner of Health regarding the disclosure form and rules
promulgated pursuant to the Alzheimer’s Dementia and Other Forms of
Dementia Special Care Disclosure Act.
1. The Council shall consist of nine (9) members to be
appointed by the State Commissioner of Health for such terms as he
ENR. S. B. NO. 1502 Page 4

or she chooses. The members shall be individuals who have knowledge
and expertise in the field of memory care or individuals who are
consumer representatives directly impacted by memory-care services,
provided that neither the members with knowledge and expertise in
the field nor the members who are consumer representatives shall
comprise more than two-thirds (2/3) of the total membership. The
members who are consumer representatives shall be individuals with
immediate family members who have received or are currently
receiving memory-care services in Oklahoma and shall not be
employees or board members of any facilities or entities subject to
the Alzheimer’s Dementia and Other Forms of Dementia Special Care
Disclosure Act.
2. The members of the Council shall serve without compensation.
3. The Council shall conduct an organizational meeting at a
date and location to be chosen by the Commissioner and as frequently
thereafter as necessary to perform the duties imposed upon it. A
majority of the members present shall constitute a quorum.
4. Staff assistance for the Council shall be provided by the
staff of the State Department of Health.
G. If a facility described in paragraph 1 of subsection A of
this section, or any individual employed or contracted by such
facility, violates any of the provisions of the Alzheimer’s Dementia
and Other Forms of Dementia Special Care Disclosure Act or the rules
promulgated pursuant thereto, the facility shall be subject to the
notice and enforcement provisions established for the facility’s
license by the Department.
H. G. Any facility that offers specialized memory or dementia
care through a specific unit or program shall post:
1. The disclosure form, including the information required to
be included by this section, on the facility’s website; and
2. A poster, in a conspicuous location in the special care
unit, program, or facility where care is provided for persons with
Alzheimer’s dementia or other forms of dementia, stating that if
such persons or their representatives were not given a copy of the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1502 Page 5

disclosure form, they may file a complaint with the Consumer
Protection Unit of the Office of the Attorney General.
I. H. The Department shall establish a website with a list of
those facilities that have filed a disclosure form pursuant to the
Alzheimer’s Dementia and Other Forms of Dementia Special Care
Disclosure Act. The website shall contain a link to the submitted
disclosure form and a table containing items from the disclosure
form, including staffing ratios, staff training, special programming
and activities, and accreditations or certifications.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1502 Page 6

Passed the Senate the 9th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1502 Page 7